test/src/older-gt-norm-yamls/N-I-wawi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wâwi - ok : # inanimate noun, egg AEW NI1
     wâwi+N+I+Sg: wâwi
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: niwâwim
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kiwâwim
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: niwâwiminân
     wâwi+N+I+Px12Pl+Sg: kiwâwiminaw
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kiwâwimiwâw
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: owâwim
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: owâwimiwâw
     wâwi+N+I+Px4Pl+Sg: owâwimiyiw
              
     wâwi+N+I: wâwa
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: niwâwa
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kiwâwa
     wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: niwâwiminâna
     wâwi+N+I+Px12Pl+Pl: kiwâwiminawa
     wâwi+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kiwâwimiwâwa
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: owâwima
     wâwi+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: owâwimiwâwa
     wâwi+N+I+Px4Pl+Pl: owâwimiyiwa
              
     wâwi+N+I+Loc: wâwihk
     wâwi+N+I+1Sg+Loc: niwâwimihk
     wâwi+N+I+2Sg+Loc: kiwâwimihk
     wâwi+N+I+1Pl+Loc: niwâwiminâhk
     wâwi+N+I+12Pl+Loc: kiwâwiminâhk
     wâwi+N+I+2Pl+Loc: kiwâwimiwâhk
     wâwi+N+I+3Sg+Loc: owâwimihk
     wâwi+N+I+3Pl+Loc: owâwimiwâhk
     wâwi+N+I+4Pl+Loc: owâwimiyihk
              
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [wâwis, wâwisis]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl: [wâwisa, wâwisisa]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Loc+Sg: [wâwisihk, wâwisisihk]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: [niwâwimis, niwâwimisis]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: [niwâwimisa, niwâwimisisa]
     wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: [niwâwimisihk, niwâwimisisihk]
